Massachusetts, session 194th, S2516.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. The General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, are hereby
2 amended by inserting after chapter 93L the following chapter:
3 Chapter 93M. Massachusetts Data Privacy Act
4 Section 1. Definitions.
5 (a) As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
6 (1) “Affiliate” means a legal entity that shares common branding with another legal entity
7 or controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another legal entity. For the
8 purposes of this subdivision, “control” and “controlled” mean:
9 (A) ownership of, or the power to vote, more than fifty per cent of the outstanding shares
10 of any class of voting security of a company;
11 (B) control in any manner over the election of a majority of the directors or of individuals
12 exercising similar functions; or
1 of 70

13 (C) the power to exercise controlling influence over the management of a company.
14 (2) “Affirmative Consent” means a clear affirmative act signifying a consumer's freely
15 given, specific, informed, revokable, and unambiguous authorization for an act or practice after
16 having been informed, in response to a specific request from a controller, provided that:
17 (A) the request is provided to the consumer in a clear and conspicuous stand-alone
18 disclosure;
19 (B) the request includes a description of the processing purpose for which the consumer’s
20 consent is sought and:
21 (1) clearly distinguishes between an act or practice that is necessary to fulfill a request of
22 the consumer and an act or practice that is for another purpose;
23 (2) clearly states the specific categories of personal data that the controller intends to
24 collect, process, or transfer under each act or practice; and
25 (3) is written in easy-to-understand language and includes a prominent heading that
26 would enable a reasonable consumer to identify and understand each act or practice;
27 (C) the request clearly explains the consumer's rights related to consent;
28 (D) the request is made in a manner reasonably accessible to and usable by consumers
29 with disabilities;
30 (E) the request is made prior to the controller’s implementation of the act or practice;
31 (F) the request is made available to the consumer in each language in which the controller
32 provides a product or service for which authorization is sought;
2 of 70

33 (G) the option to refuse to give consent is at least as prominent as the option to give
34 consent and the option to refuse to give consent takes the same number of steps or fewer as the
35 option to give consent; and
36 (H) affirmative consent to an act or practice is not inferred from the inaction of the
37 consumer or the consumer’s continued use of a service or product provided by the controller.
38 “Affirmative Consent” does not include:
39 (A) acceptance of a general or broad terms of use or similar document that contains
40 descriptions of personal data processing along with other, unrelated information;
41 (B) hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of content;
42 (C) agreement obtained through the use of a false, fictitious, fraudulent, or materially
43 misleading statement or representation; or
44 (D) agreement obtained through the use of dark patterns or deceptive design.
45 (3) “Authenticate” means to use reasonable means to determine that a request to exercise
46 any of the rights afforded under this chapter is being made by, or on behalf of, the consumer who
47 is entitled to exercise such consumer rights with respect to the personal data at issue.
48 (4) “Biometric data” means data generated by automatic measurements of an individual's
49 biological characteristics, such as a fingerprint, a voiceprint or vocal biomarker, eye retinas,
50 irises, gait or personally identifying physical movement or patterns, or other unique biological
51 patterns or characteristics that can be used to identify a specific individual.
52 “Biometric data” does not include:
3 of 70

53 (A) a digital or physical photograph,
54 (B) an audio or video recording, or
55 (C) any data generated from a digital or physical photograph, or an audio or video
56 recording, unless such data is generated to identify a specific individual.
57 (5) “Business associate” has the same meaning as provided in HIPAA.
58 (6) “Child” has the same meaning as provided in COPPA.
59 (7) “Closed-Loop Referral System” or “CLRS” means any system that: (1) stores the
60 social care information of one or more individuals; (2) enables the sharing of social care
61 information with and between participating entities for the purpose of referring individuals for
62 social care; and (3) is capable of updating or showing updated referral activity, including data
63 related to participating organizations completing referrals.
64 (8) “Collect” means buying, renting, gathering, obtaining, receiving, accessing, or
65 otherwise acquiring personal data by any means.
66 (9) “Consumer” means an individual who is a resident of Massachusetts or is present in
67 Massachusetts, including those identified by a unique persistent identifier.
68 (10) "Contextual advertising” means displaying or presenting an advertisement that does
69 not vary based on the identity of the individual recipient and is based solely on:
70 (A) the immediate content of a webpage or online service within which the advertisement
71 appears; or
4 of 70

72 (B) a specific request of the consumer for information or feedback if displayed in
73 proximity to the results of such request for information;
74 Provided, however, that a controller may use the following types of personal data to
75 display a contextual advertisement so long as the personal data is not used to make inferences
76 about the consumer, profile the consumer, or for any other purpose, and that the consumer may
77 use technical means to obfuscate or change their physical location and to specify a language
78 preference:
79 (A) such technical specifications as are necessary for the ad to be delivered and display
80 properly on a given device;
81 (B) a consumer’s immediate presence in a geographic area with a radius no smaller than
82 10 miles, or an area reasonably estimated to include online activity from at least 5,000 users, but
83 not including precise geolocation data; or
84 (C) the consumer’s language preferences, as inferred from context, browser settings, or
85 user settings.
86 (11) “Controller” means a person who, alone or jointly with others, determines the
87 purpose and means of collecting or processing personal data.
88 (12) “COPPA” means the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998, 15 USC
89 6501 et seq., and the regulations, rules, guidance and exemptions adopted pursuant to said act, as
90 said act and such regulations, rules, guidance and exemptions may be amended from time to
91 time.
92 (13) “Covered entity” has the same meaning as provided in HIPAA.
5 of 70

93 (14) “Dark pattern or deceptive design” means a user interface designed or manipulated
94 with the substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision-making or choice,
95 and includes, but is not limited to, any practice the Federal Trade Commission refers to as a
96 “dark pattern”.
97 (15) “Data broker” means a controller, or a unit or units of a controller, separately or
98 together, that knowingly: (a) processes and sells the personal data of a consumer with whom the
99 controller does not have a direct relationship; or (b) licenses to third parties the personal data of a
100 consumer with whom the controller does not have a direct relationship. For the purposes of this
101 definition, direct relationship with a controller means a consumer is a: (a) customer, client,
102 subscriber, user, or registered user of the controller's goods or services within the last five
103 calendar years; (b) employee, contractor, or agent of the controller; or (c) investor in the
104 controller.
105 (16) “Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the
106 consumer” means decisions that result in access to, or the provision or denial by the controller of,
107 financial or lending services, housing, insurance, education enrollment or opportunity, criminal
108 justice, employment opportunities, health care services, or access to essential goods or services.
109 (17) “De-identified data” means data that does not identify and cannot reasonably be used
110 to infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, an identified or identifiable individual, or a
111 device linked to such individual, if the controller that possesses such data:
112 (A) takes reasonable physical, administrative, and technical measures to ensure that such
113 data cannot be associated with an individual or be used to re-identify any individual or device
114 that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to an individual,
6 of 70

115 (B) publicly commits to process such data only in a de-identified fashion and not attempt
116 to re-identify such data, and
117 (C) contractually obligates any recipients of such data to satisfy the criteria set forth in
118 subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this subdivision.
119 (18) “Derived data” means personal data that is created by the derivation of information,
120 data, assumptions, correlations, inferences, predictions, or conclusions from facts, evidence, or
121 another source of information or data about an individual or an individual’s device.
122 (19) “Device” means any electronic equipment capable of collecting, processing, or
123 transferring data that is used by one or more individuals or households.
124 (20) “Genetic information”, any data, regardless of its format, that concerns an
125 individual’s genetic characteristics, including but not limited to:
126 (i) raw sequence data that results from the sequencing of the complete, or a portion of the,
127 extracted deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) of an individual; or
128 (ii) genotypic and phenotypic information that results from analyzing raw sequence data
129 described in subparagraph (i).
130 (21) “First party” means a consumer-facing controller with which the consumer intends
131 or expects to interact.
132 (22) “First-party advertising” means processing by a first party of its own first-party data
133 for the purposes of advertising and marketing and carried out:
7 of 70

134 (A) through direct communications with a consumer, such as direct mail, email, or text
135 message communications;
136 (B) in a physical location operated by the first party; or
137 (C) through display or presentation of an advertisement on the first party’s own website,
138 application or its other online content.
139 “First-party advertising” includes marketing measurement related to such advertising and
140 marketing.
141 (23) “First-party data” means personal data collected directly from a consumer by a first
142 party, including based on a visit by the consumer to or use by the consumer of a website, a
143 physical location, or an online service operated by the first party.
144 (24) “Gender-affirming health care services” means all supplies, care and services of a
145 medical, behavioral health, mental health, surgical, psychiatric, therapeutic, diagnostic,
146 preventative, rehabilitative or supportive nature relating to the treatment of gender dysphoria.
147 (25) “Gender-affirming health data” means any personal data concerning a past, present,
148 or future effort made by a consumer to seek, or a consumer's receipt of, gender-affirming health
149 care services.
150 (26) “HIPAA” means the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996,
151 42 USC 1320d et seq., as amended from time to time.
152 (27) “Identified or identifiable individual” means an individual who can be readily
153 identified, directly or indirectly, including but not limited to, by reference to an identifier such as
8 of 70

154 a name, an identification number, specific geolocation data or historical pattern of geolocation
155 data, or an online identifier.
156 “Large data holder” means a controller or processor that in the most recent calendar year:
157 (i) had annual gross revenues of $200,000,000 or more; and
158 (ii) collected, processed, or transferred the personal data of more than 2,000,000
159 individuals or devices that identify or are linked or reasonably linkable to one or more
160 individuals, excluding personal data collected and processed solely for the purpose of initiating,
161 rendering, billing for, finalizing, completing, or otherwise collecting payment for a requested
162 product or service; or the sensitive data of more than 200,000 individuals or devices that identify
163 or are linked or reasonably linkable to one or more individuals.
164 The term “large data holder” does not include any instance in which the controller or
165 processor would qualify as a large data holder solely on the basis of collecting or processing
166 personal email addresses, personal telephone numbers, or log-in information of an individual or
167 device to allow the individual or device to log in to an account administered by the controller or
168 service provider.
169 (28) “Legally-protected health care activity”, means (i) the exercise and enjoyment, or
170 attempted exercise and enjoyment, by any person of rights to reproductive or sexual health care
171 or gender-affirming health care services secured by the constitution or laws of the
172 commonwealth or the provision of insurance coverage for such services; or (ii) any act or
173 omission undertaken to aid or encourage, or attempt to aid or encourage, any person in the
174 exercise and enjoyment, or attempted exercise and enjoyment, of rights to reproductive or sexual
175 health care or gender-affirming health care services secured by the constitution or laws of the
9 of 70

176 commonwealth or to provide insurance coverage for such services; provided, however, that the
177 provision of such a health care service by a person duly licensed under the laws of the
178 commonwealth and physically present in the commonwealth and the provision of insurance
179 coverage for such services shall be legally protected if the service is permitted under the laws of
180 the commonwealth, regardless of the patient’s location; and provided further, that “legally-
181 protected health care activity” shall not include any service rendered below an applicable
182 professional standard of care or that would violate anti-discrimination laws of the
183 commonwealth.
184 (29) “Legally-protected health care data” means any personal data concerning past,
185 present, or future legally-protected health care activity.
186 (30) “Marketing measurement” means measuring and reporting on marketing
187 performance or media performance by the controller, including processing personal data for
188 measurement and reporting of frequency, attribution, and performance.
189 (31) “Material” means, with respect to an act, practice, or representation of a controller,
190 including a representation made by the controller in a privacy notice or similar disclosure to
191 individuals, involving the collection, processing, or transfer of personal data, that such act,
192 practice, or representation is likely to affect a reasonable individual’s decision or conduct
193 regarding a product or service.
194 (32) “Minor” means any consumer who is younger than 18 years of age.
195 (33) “Neural data” means any information that is generated by measuring the activity of
196 an individual's central or peripheral nervous system.
10 of 70

197 (34) “OCABR” means the Office of Consumer Affairs and Business Regulation.
198 (35) “Participating organization” means any entity that has the ability to create, receive,
199 or update referrals, or other social care information in a CLRS, including, but not limited to,
200 healthcare providers, health plans, public agencies, charitable and nonprofit organizations, CLRS
201 technology vendors, and entities that provide social care.
202 (36) “Person” means an individual, association, company, limited liability company,
203 corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, trust or other legal entity.
204 (37) “Personal data” means any information, including derived data and unique persistent
205 identifiers, that is linked or reasonably linkable, alone or in combination with other information,
206 to an identified or identifiable individual or a device that identifies or is linked or reasonably
207 linkable to an individual. “Personal data” does not include de-identified data or publicly
208 available information.
209 (38) “Precise geolocation data” means information derived from technology or a device,
210 including, but not limited to, latitude and longitude coordinates from global positioning system
211 mechanisms or other similar positional data, that reveals the past or present physical location of
212 an individual or device that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to one or more
213 individuals with precision and accuracy within a radius of one thousand seven hundred fifty feet
214 or less.
215 “Precise geolocation data” does not include the content of communications, a photograph
216 or video, metadata associated with a photograph or video that cannot be linked to an individual.
11 of 70

217 (39) “Process” and “processing” mean any operation or set of operations performed,
218 whether by manual or automated means, on personal data or on sets of personal data, such as the
219 use, storage, disclosure, analysis, deletion or modification of personal data.
220 (40) “Processor” means a person who collects, processes, or transfers personal data on
221 behalf of, and at the direction of, a controller or another processor, or a Federal, State, Tribal, or
222 local government entity.
223 (41) “Profiling” means any form of processing performed on personal data to evaluate,
224 analyze or predict personal aspects including an individual’s economic situation, health, personal
225 preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements.
226 (42) “Protected health information” has the same meaning as provided in HIPAA.
227 (43) “Publicly available information” means information that has been lawfully made
228 available to the general public from:
229 (A) federal, state or municipal government records, if the person collects, processes, and
230 transfers such information in accordance with any restrictions or terms of use placed on the
231 information by the relevant government entity;
232 (B) widely distributed media; or
233 (C) a disclosure to the general public as required by federal, state, or local law.
234 “Publicly available information” does not include:
235 (A) Any obscene visual depiction, as defined in section 1460 of title 18, United States
236 Code;
12 of 70

237 (B) any inference made exclusively from multiple independent sources of publicly
238 available information that reveals sensitive data with respect to a consumer;
239 (C) biometric data;
240 (D) personal data that is created through the combination of personal data with publicly
241 available information;
242 (E) genetic information, unless otherwise made publicly available by the individual to
243 whom the information pertains;
244 (F) information made available by a consumer on a website or online service made
245 available to all members of the public, for free or for a fee, where the consumer has restricted the
246 information to a specific audience; or
247 (G) intimate images, authentic or computer-generated, known to be nonconsensual.
248 (44) “Reproductive or sexual health care” means all supplies, care and services of a
249 medical, behavioral health, mental health, surgical, psychiatric, therapeutic, diagnostic,
250 preventative, rehabilitative or supportive nature relating to pregnancy, contraception, assisted
251 reproduction, miscarriage management, the termination of a pregnancy. a consumer’s
252 reproductive system or sexual well-being, including, but not limited to, any such supplies, care
253 and services rendered or provided concerning:
254 (A) an individual health condition, status, disease, diagnosis, diagnostic test or treatment,
255 (B) a social, psychological, behavioral or medical intervention,
256 (C) a surgery or procedure, including, but not limited to, an abortion,
13 of 70

257 (D) a use or purchase of a medication, including, but not limited to, a medication used or
258 purchased for the purposes of an abortion,
259 (E) a bodily function, vital sign or symptom,
260 (F) a measurement of a bodily function, vital sign or symptom, or
261 (G) an abortion, including, but not limited to, medical or nonmedical services, products,
262 diagnostics, counseling or follow-up services for an abortion.
263 (45) “Reproductive or sexual health data” means any personal data concerning a past,
264 present, or future effort made by a consumer to seek, or a consumer's receipt of, reproductive or
265 sexual health care.
266 (46) “Sale of personal data” means the exchange of personal data for monetary or other
267 valuable consideration by the controller to a third party.
268 “Sale of personal data” does not include:
269 (A) the disclosure of personal data to a processor that processes the personal data on
270 behalf of the controller if limited to the purposes of the processing;
271 (B) the disclosure of personal data to a third party for purposes of providing a product or
272 service affirmatively requested by the consumer;
273 (C) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to an affiliate of the controller;
274 (D) with the consumer’s affirmative consent, the disclosure of personal data where the
275 consumer affirmatively directs the controller to disclose the personal data or intentionally uses
276 the controller to interact with a third party; or
14 of 70

277 (E) the disclosure of personal data that the consumer:
278 (i) intentionally made available to the general public via a channel of mass media; and
279 (ii) did not restrict to a specific audience.
280 (47) “Sensitive data” means personal data that includes:
281 (A) A government-issued identifier, such as a Social Security number, passport number,
282 state identification card or driver’s license number but does not include a government-issued
283 identifier required by law to be displayed in public;
284 (B) Any information that describes or reveals the past, present, or future physical health,
285 mental health, disability, diagnosis, or healthcare condition, or treatment of an individual, and
286 includes, but is not limited to, gender-affirming health data, reproductive or sexual health data,
287 legally-protected health care data, and neural data;
288 (C) A consumer’s tax return and account number, financial account number, debit card
289 number, credit card number, or information that describes or reveals the income level,
290 indebtedness, or bank account balances of an individual;
291 (D) Biometric data or genetic information or information derived therefrom;
292 (F) Precise geolocation information;
293 (G) An individual’s private communications such as voicemails, emails, texts, direct
294 messages, mail, voice communications, and video communications, or information identifying
295 the parties to such communications or pertaining to the transmission of such communications,
296 including telephone numbers called, telephone numbers from which calls were placed, the time
15 of 70

297 calls were made, call duration, and location information of the parties to the call.
298 Communications are not private for purposes of this sub-paragraph if such communications are
299 made from or to a device provided by an employer to an employee insofar as such employer
300 provides conspicuous notice that such employer may access such communications;
301 (H) Account or device log-in credentials, or security or access codes for an account or
302 device;
303 (I) Information identifying the sexual behavior of an individual;
304 (J) Calendar information, address book information, phone or text logs, photos, audio
305 recordings, or videos, maintained for private use by an individual, regardless of whether such
306 information is stored on the individual's device or is accessible from that device and is backed up
307 in a separate location. Such information is not sensitive for purposes of this sub-paragraph if
308 such information is sent from or to a device provided by an employer to an employee insofar as
309 such employer provides conspicuous notice that it may access such information;
310 (L) Information revealing the video content requested or selected by an individual. This
311 clause does not include personal data used solely for transfers for independent video
312 measurement;
313 (M) Personal data of an individual when a controller or processor knows or should have
314 known that an individual is a minor;
315 (N) An individual's race, color, ethnicity, religion, national origin, citizenship,
316 immigration status, philosophical beliefs, or union membership;
16 of 70

317 (O) Information identifying an individual’s online activities over time and across
318 websites, online applications, or mobile applications that do not share common branding, or data
319 generated by profiling performed on such data;
320 (P) Information that reveals the status of an individual as a veteran, or member of the
321 military division established under chapter 33 or Armed Forces of the United States;
322 (Q) Information that reveals an individual’s sexual orientation, or status as transgender or
323 non-binary;
324 (R) Information that reveals the status of an individual as a victim of a crime;
325 (S) An individual’s keystrokes;
326 (T) An individual’s driving behavior;
327 (U) social care information that is stored in or transmitted through a closed-loop referral
328 system; or
329 (V) Any other data collected, processed, or transferred for the purpose of identifying the
330 types of personal data listed in subparagraphs (A) through (U), inclusive.
331 (48) “Small business” means a controller or processor that meets the following criteria
332 for the period of the 3 preceding calendar years (or for the period during which the controller or
333 processor has been in existence if such period is less than 3 years):
334 (A) The controller or processor’ average annual gross revenues during the period did not
335 exceed $20,000,000;
17 of 70

336 (B) The controller or processor, on average, did not annually collect, process, retain, or
337 transfer the personal data of more than 200,000 individuals during the period for any purpose
338 other than initiating, rendering, billing for, finalizing, completing, or otherwise collecting
339 payment for a requested service or product; and
340 (C) The controller or processor did not transfer personal data to a third party in exchange
341 for revenue or other valuable consideration, except for purposes of initiating, rendering, billing
342 for, finalizing, completing, or otherwise collecting payment for a requested service or product.
343 (49) “Social care” means care, services, goods, or supplies related to an individual’s
344 social needs. “Social care” includes, but is not limited to, support and assistance for an
345 individual’s food stability and nutritional needs, housing, transportation, economic stability,
346 employment, education access and quality, child care and family relationship needs, and
347 environmental and physical safety.
348 (50) “Social care information” means any information that relates to the need for,
349 payment for, or provision of social care, and identifies the person receiving social care, or for
350 which there is a reasonable basis to believe the information can be used to identify the individual
351 receiving social care.
352 (51) “Targeted advertising” means displaying or presenting an online advertisement to a
353 consumer or to a device identified by a unique persistent identifier, or to a group of consumers or
354 devices identified by unique persistent identifiers, if the advertisement is selected based, in
355 whole or in part, on known or predicted preferences, characteristics, behavior, or interests
356 associated with the consumer or a device identified by a unique persistent identifier.
18 of 70

357 “Targeted advertising” includes displaying or presenting an online advertisement for a
358 product or service based on the previous interaction of a consumer or a device identified by a
359 unique persistent identifier with such product or service on a website or online service that does
360 not share common branding with the website or online service displaying or presenting the
361 advertisement, and marketing measurement related to such advertisements.
362 “Targeted advertising” does not include:
363 (A) first-party advertising; or
364 (B) contextual advertising.
365 (52) “Third party” means a person that collects personal data from another person that is
366 not the consumer to whom the data pertains and is not a processor with respect to such data.
367 “Third party” does not include a person that collects personal data from another entity if
368 the two entities are affiliates.
369 (53) “Trade secret” has the same meaning as provided in section 42 of chapter 93.
370 (54) “Transfer” means to disclose, release, disseminate, make available, license, rent, or
371 share personal data to a third party orally, in writing, electronically, or by any other means.
372 (55) "Unique persistent identifier" means a technologically created identifier to the extent
373 that such identifier is reasonably linkable to a consumer or a device that identifies or is linked or
374 reasonably linkable to 1 or more consumers, including device identifiers, Internet Protocol
375 addresses, cookies, beacons, pixel tags, mobile ad identifiers or similar technology customer
376 numbers, unique pseudonyms, user aliases, telephone numbers, or other forms of persistent or
377 probabilistic identifiers that are linked or reasonably linkable to 1 or more consumers or devices.
19 of 70

378 The term "unique persistent identifier" does not include an identifier assigned by a
379 controller for the sole purpose of giving effect to the exercise of affirmative consent or opt out by
380 a consumer with respect to the collecting, processing, and transfer of personal data or otherwise
381 limiting the collecting, processing, or transfer of personal data.
382 Section 2. Applicability.
383 The provisions of this chapter apply to persons that conduct business in this state or
384 persons that produce products or services that are targeted to residents of this state and that
385 during the preceding calendar year:
386 (a) Collected or processed the personal data of not less than 25,000 consumers, excluding
387 personal data controlled or processed solely for the purpose of completing a payment transaction,
388 so long as all personal data collected or processed for such purpose was deleted or de-identified
389 within 90 days, except when necessary to investigate fraud or as consistent with a business’s
390 return policy; or
391 (b) derived revenue or other valuable consideration from the sale of personal data.
392 Section 3. Scope.
393 (a) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to (1) any Federal, State, Tribal, territorial,
394 or local government entity such as a body, authority, board, bureau, commission, district or
395 agency of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision of the Commonwealth; (2) a
396 nonprofit organization that is established to detect and prevent fraudulent acts in connection with
397 insurance, and is operating solely for that purpose; (3) a national securities association registered
398 pursuant to § 15A of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78a, et seq., as amended)
20 of 70

399 and the rules and implementing regulations promulgated thereunder, and operating solely for that
400 purpose; and (4) a registered futures association so designated pursuant to § 17 of the
401 Commodity Exchange Act (7 U.S.C. § 1, et seq., as amended) and the rules and implementing
402 regulations promulgated thereunder, and operating solely for that purpose.
403 (b) The following information and data is exempt from the provisions of this chapter,
404 provided only if said information and data is processed, collected, or transferred, as applicable, in
405 compliance with the federal statutes or regulations referenced, if any, in each exemption under
406 this paragraph:
407 (1) protected health information that a covered entity or business associate collects or
408 processes in accordance with, or documents that a covered entity or business associate creates for
409 the purpose of complying with HIPAA and regulations promulgated under HIPAA;
410 (2) patient-identifying information for purposes of 42 USC 290dd-2, as amended from
411 time to time;
412 (3) identifiable private information for purposes of the federal policy for the protection of
413 human subjects under 45 CFR 46;
414 (4) identifiable private information that is otherwise information collected as part of
415 human subjects research pursuant to the good clinical practice guidelines issued by the
416 International Council for Harmonization of Technical Requirements for Pharmaceuticals for
417 Human Use;
418 (5) the protection of human subjects under 21 CFR Parts 6, 50 and 56, or personal data
419 used or shared in research, as defined in 45 CFR 164.501, that is conducted in accordance with
21 of 70

420 the standards set forth in this subdivision and subdivisions (3) and (4) of this subsection, or other
421 research conducted in accordance with applicable law;
422 (6) information and documents created for purposes of the Health Care Quality
423 Improvement Act of 1986, 42 USC 11101 et seq. as amended from time to time;
424 (7) patient safety work product for purposes of the Patient Safety and Quality
425 Improvement Act, 42 USC 299b-21 et seq., as amended from time to time;
426 (8) information derived from any of the health care-related information listed in this
427 subsection that is de-identified in accordance with the requirements for de-identification pursuant
428 to HIPAA;
429 (9) Personal information collected, processed, or sold subject to Title V of the Gramm-
430 Leach-Bliley Act, 15 USC 6801 et seq. as amended from time to time;
431 (10) personal data collected, processed, sold or disclosed subject to the Driver's Privacy
432 Protection Act of 1994, 18 USC 2721 et seq., as amended from time to time;
433 (11) personal data regulated by the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 USC
434 1232g et seq., as amended from time to time;
435 (12) data collected, processed, or maintained:
436 (A) in the course of an individual applying to, employed by or acting as an agent or
437 independent contractor of a controller, processor, or third party, to the extent that the data is
438 collected and used within the context of that role,
22 of 70

439 (B) as the emergency contact information of an individual under this chapter used for
440 emergency contact purposes, or;
441 (C) that is necessary to retain to administer benefits for another individual relating to the
442 individual who is the subject of the information under subdivision (1) of this subsection and used
443 for the purposes of administering such benefits.
444 (c) Controllers and processors that comply with the verifiable parental consent
445 requirements of COPPA shall be deemed compliant with any obligation to obtain parental
446 consent pursuant to this chapter.
447 Section 4. Consumer rights.
448 (a) A consumer shall have the right to:
449 (1) Confirm whether or not a controller is collecting or processing the consumer's
450 personal data, including, but not limited to, any inferences about the consumer derived from such
451 personal data, and access such personal data;
452 (2) obtain from a controller a list of specific third parties, other than natural persons, to
453 which the controller has transferred either (i) the consumer’s personal data; or (ii) any personal
454 data;
455 (3) correct inaccuracies in the consumer's personal data, taking into account the nature of
456 the personal data and the purposes of the processing of the consumer's personal data, and instruct
457 a controller or processor to make reasonable efforts to notify all third parties or processors to
458 which the controller has transferred such personal data of such corrections;
23 of 70

459 (4) delete personal data provided by, or obtained about, the consumer, including personal
460 data the consumer provided to the controller, personal data the controller obtained from another
461 source, and derived data and instruct a controller or processor to make reasonable efforts to
462 notify all third parties or processors to which the controller has transferred such personal data of
463 such deletion request;
464 (5) obtain a copy of the consumer's personal data collected or processed by the controller,
465 in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows the
466 consumer to transmit the data to another controller without hindrance, where the processing is
467 carried out by automated means; and
468 (6) opt out of the collection and processing of the personal data for purposes of
469 (A) targeted advertising;
470 (B) the transfer of personal data; or
471 (C) profiling in furtherance of solely automated decisions that produce legal or similarly
472 significant effects concerning the consumer.
473 (b)(1) If a consumer’s personal data is profiled in furtherance of decisions that produce
474 legal effects concerning a consumer or similarly significant effects concerning a consumer, the
475 consumer has the right to question the result of such profiling, to be informed of the reason why
476 the profiling resulted in the decisions, and, if feasible, to be informed of what actions the
477 consumer might have taken to secure a different decisions and the actions that the consumer
478 might take to secure a different decision in the future.
24 of 70

479 (2) The consumer has the right to review the consumer’s personal data used in the
480 profiling.
481 (3) If the decision is determined to have been based upon inaccurate personal data, the
482 consumer has the right to have the data corrected and the profiling decision revaluated based
483 upon the corrected data.
484 (c) A consumer may exercise rights under this section by a secure and reliable means
485 established by the controller and described to the consumer in the controller's privacy notice. A
486 consumer may designate an authorized agent in accordance with section 5 of this chapter to
487 exercise the rights of such consumer specified in this section on behalf of the consumer. In the
488 case of personal data of a known child, the parent or legal guardian may exercise such consumer
489 rights on the child's behalf. In the case of personal data concerning a consumer subject to a
490 guardianship, conservatorship or other protective arrangement, the guardian or the conservator of
491 the consumer may exercise such rights on the consumer's behalf.
492 (d) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a controller shall comply with a request
493 by a consumer to exercise the consumer rights authorized in this chapter as follows:
494 (1) A controller shall respond to the consumer without undue delay, but not later than
495 forty-five days after receipt of the request. The controller may extend the response period once
496 by twenty additional days when reasonably necessary, considering the complexity and number of
497 the consumer's requests, provided the controller informs the consumer of any such extension
498 within the initial forty-five-day response period and of the reason for the extension.
499 (2) If a controller declines to take action regarding the consumer's request, the controller
500 shall inform the consumer without undue delay, but not later than forty-five days after receipt of
25 of 70

501 the request, of the justification for declining to take action and instructions for how to appeal the
502 decision.
503 (3) Information provided in response to a consumer request shall be provided by a
504 controller, free of charge, twice per consumer during any twelve-month period. If requests from
505 a consumer are manifestly unfounded, excessive or repetitive, the controller may charge the
506 consumer a reasonable fee to cover the administrative costs of complying with the request or
507 decline to act on the request. The controller bears the burden of demonstrating the manifestly
508 unfounded, excessive or repetitive nature of the request.
509 (4) If a controller is unable to authenticate a request to exercise any of the rights afforded
510 under subdivisions (1) to (5), inclusive, of subsection (a) of this section using commercially
511 reasonable efforts, the controller shall not be required to comply with a request to initiate an
512 action pursuant to this section and shall provide notice to the consumer that the controller is
513 unable to authenticate the request to exercise such right or rights until such consumer provides
514 additional information reasonably necessary to authenticate such consumer and such consumer's
515 request to exercise such right or rights, provided that any such information may not be used for
516 any purposes other than the authentication of such consumer. A controller shall not require
517 authentication to exercise an opt-out request, but a controller may deny an opt-out request if the
518 controller has a good faith, reasonable and documented belief that such request is fraudulent. If a
519 controller denies an opt-out request because the controller believes such request is fraudulent, the
520 controller shall send a notice to the person who made such request disclosing that such controller
521 believes such request is fraudulent, why such controller believes such request is fraudulent and
522 that such controller shall not comply with such request. If the request was placed through an
523 agent, both the agent and the person who appointed the agent shall receive that notice.
26 of 70

524 (5) A controller that has obtained personal data about a consumer from a source other
525 than the consumer shall be deemed in compliance with a consumer's request to delete such data
526 pursuant to subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section by deleting the consumer’s personal
527 data retained by the controller and retaining a record of the deletion request and the minimum
528 data necessary for the purpose of ensuring the consumer's personal data remains deleted from the
529 controller's records and not using such retained data for any other purpose pursuant to this
530 chapter.
531 (d) A controller shall establish a process for a consumer to appeal the controller's refusal
532 to take action on a request within a reasonable period of time after the consumer's receipt of the
533 decision. The appeal process shall be conspicuously available and similar to the process for
534 submitting requests to initiate action pursuant to this section. Not later than sixty days after
535 receipt of an appeal, a controller shall inform the consumer in writing of any action taken or not
536 taken in response to the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions.
537 If the appeal is denied, the controller shall also provide the consumer with an online mechanism,
538 if available, or other method through which the consumer may contact the Attorney General to
539 submit a complaint.
540 (e) A controller may not condition, effectively condition, attempt to condition, or attempt
541 to effectively condition the exercise of a right described in this section through:
542 (1) the use of any false, fictitious, fraudulent, or materially misleading statement or
543 representation; or
544 (2) the use of dark patterns or deceptive design.
27 of 70

545 (f) A controller or processor may not collect, process, or transfer personal data in a
546 manner that discriminates against, or threaten to discriminate against, an individual or class of
547 individuals, or otherwise makes unavailable the equal enjoyment of goods or services, on the
548 basis of an individual's or class of individuals’ actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, sex,
549 sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, physical or mental disability, religion,
550 genetic information, pregnancy or condition related to pregnancy, status as a veteran, ancestry,
551 national origin, citizenship, immigration status, or any other basis protected by chapter 151B.
552 (g) Subsection (f) does not apply to:
553 (1) The collection, processing, or transfer of personal data for the sole purpose of:
554 (A) A controller or processor’s self-testing to prevent or mitigate unlawful discrimination
555 or otherwise to ensure compliance with Massachusetts or federal law; or
556 (B) Diversifying an applicant, participant or customer pool; or
557 (2) A private establishment, as described in 42 United States Code, Section 2000a(e).
558 Section 5. Authorized agent.
559 (a) A consumer may designate another person to serve as the consumer's authorized
560 agent, and act on such consumer's behalf, to exercise rights specified in subsection (a) of section
561 4 of this chapter. A controller shall comply with a request received from an authorized agent if
562 the controller is able to verify, with commercially reasonable effort, the identity of the consumer
563 and the authorized agent's authority to act on such consumer's behalf.
564 (b) An individual may designate an authorized agent as provided in subsection (a) by
565 technological means, including, but not limited to, an Internet link or a browser setting, browser
28 of 70

566 extension or global device setting that indicates the individual’s intent to opt out processing for
567 one or more of the purposes specified in section 4.
568 Section 6. Actions of controllers.
569 (a) A controller shall:
570 (1) Limit the collection, processing, and transfer of personal data to what is reasonably
571 necessary to provide or maintain:
572 (A) a specific product or service requested by the consumer to whom the data pertains
573 including any routine administrative, operational, or account-servicing activity, such as billing,
574 shipping, delivery, storage, or accounting; or
575 (B) a communication, that is not an advertisement, by the controller to the consumer
576 reasonably anticipated within the context of the relationship between the controller and the
577 consumer.
578 Except with respect to sensitive data, a controller may process or transfer personal data
579 collected under this subsection to provide first-party advertising or targeted advertising;
580 provided, however, that this paragraph does not permit the processing or transfer of personal data
581 for targeted advertising to a consumer who has opted out of such advertising pursuant to section
582 4, 5, or 6, or to a consumer under circumstances where the controller knows or should have
583 known that the consumer is a minor;
584 (2) not collect, process, or transfer sensitive data concerning a consumer except when
585 such collection, processing, or transfer is strictly necessary to provide or maintain a specific
586 product or service requested by the consumer to whom the sensitive data pertains;
29 of 70

587 (3) not sell sensitive data;
588 (4) establish, implement and maintain reasonable administrative, technical and physical
589 data security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity and accessibility of personal data
590 appropriate to the volume and nature of the personal data at issue, including disposing of
591 personal data in accordance with a retention schedule that requires the deletion of personal data
592 when the data is required to be deleted by law or is no longer necessary for the purpose for which
593 the data was collected, processed, or transferred;
594 (5) not transfer sensitive data concerning a consumer without obtaining the consumer's
595 affirmative consent, or, in the case of the collection or processing of personal data concerning a
596 known child, without collecting or processing such data in accordance with COPPA;
597 (6) provide an effective mechanism for a consumer, that does not use dark patterns or
598 deceptive design, to revoke the consumer's affirmative consent under this chapter that is at least
599 as easy as the mechanism by which the consumer provided the consumer's affirmative consent
600 and, upon revocation of such affirmative consent, cease to process the data as soon as
601 practicable, but not later than fifteen days after the receipt of such request;
602 (7) not process the personal data of a consumer for purposes of targeted advertising, or
603 sell the consumer's personal data, under circumstances where a controller knows or should have
604 known, that the consumer is a minor; and
605 (8) not discriminate or retaliate against, or threaten to discriminate or retaliate against, a
606 consumer for exercising any of the consumer rights contained in this chapter, or for refusing to
607 agree to the collection or processing of personal data for a separate product or service, including
30 of 70

608 denying goods or services, charging different prices or rates for goods or services or providing a
609 different level of quality of goods or services to the consumer.
610 (b) Nothing in paragraph (8) of subsection (a) shall be construed to require a controller to
611 provide a product or service that requires the personal data of a consumer which the controller
612 does not collect or maintain, or prohibit a controller from offering a different price, rate, level,
613 quality or selection of goods or services to a consumer, including offering goods or services for
614 no fee, if the offering is in connection with a consumer's voluntary participation in a financial
615 incentive program such as a bona fide loyalty, rewards, premium features, discounts or club card
616 program, provided that the controller may not transfer personal data to a third party as part of
617 such program unless:
618 (1) The transfer is functionally necessary to enable the third party to provide a benefit to
619 which the consumer is entitled;
620 (2) the transfer of personal data to the third party is clearly disclosed in the terms of the
621 program; and
622 (3) the third party uses the personal data only for purposes of facilitating a benefit to
623 which the consumer is entitled and does not process or transfer the personal data for any other
624 purpose.
625 The sale of personal data shall not be considered functionally necessary to provide a
626 financial incentive program. A controller shall not use financial incentive practices that are
627 unjust, unreasonable, coercive or usurious in nature.
31 of 70

628 (c) (1) A controller shall provide consumers with a reasonably accessible,
629 understandable, clear and meaningful and not misleading privacy notice that includes a detailed
630 and accurate representation of:
631 (i) The categories of personal data collected and processed by the controller, including a
632 separate list of categories of sensitive data collected and processed by the controller, described in
633 a level of detail that provides consumers a meaningful understanding of the type of personal data
634 collected or processed;
635 (ii) the purpose for collecting and processing each category of personal data the controller
636 collects or processes described in a way that gives consumers a meaningful understanding of
637 how each category of their personal data will be use;
638 (iii) how consumers may exercise their consumer rights, including how a consumer may
639 appeal a controller's decision with regard to the consumer's request;
640 (iv) the categories of personal data that the controller transfers to third parties, if any, and
641 the purposes for those transfers;
642 (v) the categories of third parties, if any, to which the controller transfers personal data
643 including the name of each data broker to which the controller transfers personal data;
644 (vi) The length of time the controller intends to retain each category of personal data, or,
645 if it is not possible to identify the length of time, the criteria used to determine the length of time
646 the controller intends to retain categories of personal data; and
647 (vii) an active electronic mail address or other online mechanism that the consumer may
648 use to contact the controller for privacy and data security inquiries.
32 of 70

649 (viii) identifies the controller, including any business name under which the controller
650 registered with the Secretary of State and any assumed business name that the controller uses in
651 Massachusetts;
652 (ix) describes any collection, processing, selling, or sharing of personal data for training
653 or use of artificial intelligence systems, if applicable;
654 (x) provides a clear and conspicuous description of any processing of personal data in
655 which the controller engages for the purposes of targeted advertising, sale of personal data to
656 third parties, or profiling the consumer in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly
657 significant effects concerning the consumer, and a procedure by which the consumer may opt out
658 of this type of processing;
659 (xi) a general description of the controller’s data security practices; and
660 (xii) the effective date of the privacy notice.
661 (2)(i) The privacy notice shall be provided directly to consumers and made available
662 online to the general public.
663 (ii) The privacy notice must be provided in a manner that is reasonably accessible to and
664 usable by individuals with disabilities. The notice shall be made available to the public in each
665 covered language in which the controller provides a product or service that is subject to the
666 privacy notice; or carries out activities related to such product or service.
667 (iii) If a controller makes a material change to its privacy notice, the controller shall
668 notify each consumer affected by the material change before implementing the material change
669 with respect to prospectively collected personal data and provide a reasonable opportunity for
33 of 70

670 each consumer to withdraw consent. A controller shall provide a reasonable opportunity for each
671 consumer to affirmatively consent to further materially different collection, processing or
672 transfer of previously collected personal data under the changed notice. The controller shall take
673 all reasonable electronic measures to provide direct notification regarding material changes to the
674 privacy notice to each affected consumer, in each covered language in which the privacy notice
675 is made available, taking into account available technology and the nature of the relationship.
676 (iv) Each large data holder shall retain copies of previous versions of its privacy notice
677 for at least 10 years beginning after the date of enactment of this chapter and publish them on its
678 website. Such large data holder shall make publicly available, in a clear, conspicuous, and
679 readily accessible manner, a log describing the date and nature of each material change to its
680 privacy notice over the past 10 years. The descriptions shall be sufficient for a reasonable
681 individual to understand the material effect of each material change. The obligations in this
682 paragraph shall not apply to any previous versions of a large data holder’s privacy notice, or any
683 material changes to such notice, that precede the date of enactment of this chapter.
684 (v) In addition to the privacy notice required under this paragraph, a large data holder that
685 is a controller shall provide a short form notice of no more than 500 words in length that includes
686 the main features of their data practices.
687 (vi) Each controller that collects, processes, or transfers biometric data shall provide a
688 separate privacy notice detailing the collection, processing, and transfer of such biometric data,
689 subject to the provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this section.
690 (vii) Each controller that collects, processes, or transfers specific precise geolocation
691 information shall provide a separate privacy notice detailing the collection, processing, and
34 of 70

692 transfer of such precise geolocation information, subject to the provisions of paragraphs (1) and
693 (2) of this section.
694 (d) If a controller sells personal data to third parties or processes personal data for
695 targeted advertising, the controller shall clearly and conspicuously disclose such sales or
696 processing, as well as the manner in which a consumer may exercise the right to opt out of such
697 sales or processing.
698 (e) A controller shall establish, and shall describe in a privacy notice, one or more secure
699 and reliable means for consumers to submit a request to exercise their consumer rights pursuant
700 to this chapter. Such means shall take into account the ways in which consumers normally
701 interact with the controller, the need for secure and reliable communication of such requests and
702 the ability of the controller to verify the identity of the consumer making the request. A
703 controller shall not require a consumer to create a new account in order to exercise consumer
704 rights, but may require a consumer to use an existing account. Any such means shall include:
705 (1) Providing a clear and conspicuous link on the controller's Internet web site to an
706 Internet web page that enables a consumer, or an agent of the consumer, to opt out of the targeted
707 advertising, the sale of the consumer's personal data, and profiling in furtherance of solely
708 automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer;
709 and
710 (2) Not later than 18 months after the effective date of this chapter, allowing a consumer
711 to opt out of any collection or processing of the consumer's personal data for the purposes of
712 targeted advertising, or any sale of the consumer’s personal data, through an opt-out preference
713 signal sent, with such consumer's consent, by a platform, technology or mechanism to the
35 of 70

714 controller indicating such consumer's intent to opt out of any such processing or sale. Such
715 platform, technology or mechanism shall:
716 (i) Be consumer-friendly and easy to use by the average consumer;
717 (ii) Not use dark patterns or deceptive design; and
718 (iii) Enable the controller to reasonably determine whether the consumer is a resident of
719 this state and whether the consumer has made a legitimate request to opt out of any sale of such
720 consumer's personal data or targeted advertising. For purposes of this subsection, the use of an
721 internet protocol address to estimate the consumer’s location shall be considered sufficient to
722 reasonably determine residency.
723 If a consumer's decision to opt out of any processing of the consumer's personal data for
724 the purposes of targeted advertising, or any sale of personal data, through an opt-out preference
725 signal sent in accordance with the provisions of this subsection conflicts with the consumer's
726 existing controller-specific privacy setting or voluntary participation in a controller's financial
727 incentive program, the controller shall comply with such consumer's opt-out preference signal
728 but may notify such consumer of such conflict and provide to such consumer the choice to
729 confirm such controller-specific privacy setting or participation in such program.
730 (f) If a controller responds to consumer opt‐out requests received pursuant to subsection
731 (e) of this section by informing the consumer of a change in the price, rate, level, quality, or
732 selection of goods or services, the controller shall present the terms of any financial incentive
733 offered pursuant to subsection (b) of this section for the retention, processing, sale or transfer of
734 the consumer's personal data.
36 of 70

735 Section 7. Responsibilities of processors and controllers.
736 (a) A processor shall adhere to the instructions of a controller and shall assist the
737 controller in meeting the controller's obligations under this chapter. Such assistance shall
738 include:
739 (1) Taking into account the nature of processing and the information available to the
740 processor, by appropriate technical and organizational measures, insofar as is reasonably
741 practicable, to fulfill the controller's obligation to respond to consumer rights requests;
742 (2) taking into account the nature of processing and the information available to the
743 processor, by assisting the controller in meeting the controller's obligations in relation to the
744 security of processing the personal data and in relation to the notification of a breach of security
745 of the system of the processor, in order to meet the controller's obligations; and
746 (3) providing necessary information to enable the controller to conduct and document
747 data protection assessments.
748 (b) A contract between a controller and a processor shall govern the processor's data
749 processing procedures with respect to processing performed on behalf of the controller. The
750 contract shall be written, binding and clearly set forth instructions for processing data, the nature
751 and purpose of processing, the type of data subject to processing, the duration of processing and
752 the rights and obligations of both parties including a method by which the processor shall notify
753 the controller of material changes to its privacy practices. The processor shall adhere to the
754 instructions of the controller and only process and transfer the data it receives from the controller
755 to the extent necessary to provide a service requested by the controller, as set out in the contract.
756 The contract shall also require that the processor:
37 of 70

757 (1) Ensure that each person processing personal data is subject to a duty of confidentiality
758 with respect to the data;
759 (2) at the controller's direction, delete or return all personal data to the controller as
760 requested at the end of the provision of services, unless retention of the personal data is required
761 by law;
762 (3) upon the reasonable request of the controller, make available to the controller all
763 information in its possession necessary to demonstrate the processor's compliance with the
764 obligations in this chapter;
765 (4) after providing the controller an opportunity to object, engage any subcontractor
766 pursuant to a written contract that requires the subcontractor to meet the contractual and statutory
767 or regulatory obligations of the processor with respect to the personal data;
768 (5) be prohibited from combining personal data that the processor receives from or on
769 behalf of a controller with personal data that the processor receives from or on behalf of another
770 person or collects from the interaction of the processor with an individual; and
771 (6) allow, and cooperate with, reasonable assessments by the controller or the controller's
772 designated assessor, or the processor may arrange for a qualified and independent assessor to
773 conduct an assessment of the processor's policies and technical and organizational measures in
774 support of the obligations under this chapter, using an appropriate and accepted control standard
775 or framework and assessment procedure for such assessments. The processor shall provide a
776 report of such assessment to the controller upon request.
38 of 70

777 (c) A processor shall establish, implement and maintain reasonable administrative,
778 technical and physical data security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity and
779 accessibility of personal data that are consistent with chapter 93H and appropriate to the volume
780 and nature of the personal data at issue.
781 (d) Nothing in the contract in subsection (b) shall relieve a controller or processor from
782 the liabilities imposed on the controller or processor by virtue of such controller's or processor's
783 role in the processing relationship, as described in this chapter.
784 (e) Determining whether a person is acting as a controller or processor with respect to a
785 specific processing of data is a fact-based determination that depends upon the context in which
786 personal data is to be processed. A person who is not limited in such person's processing of
787 personal data pursuant to a controller's instructions, or who fails to adhere to such instructions, is
788 a controller and not a processor with respect to a specific processing of data. A processor that
789 continues to adhere to a controller's instructions with respect to a specific processing of personal
790 data remains a processor. If a processor begins, alone or jointly with others, determining the
791 purposes and means of the processing of personal data, the processor is a controller with respect
792 to such processing and may be subject to an enforcement action under this chapter.
793 (f) A processor shall not process or transfer personal data on the behalf of a controller if
794 the processor knows or should have known that the controller has violated this chapter with
795 respect to such personal data.
796 Section 8. Data Protection Assessments.
797 (a) A controller shall not conduct processing that presents a heightened risk of harm to a
798 consumer without conducting and documenting a data protection assessment for each of the
39 of 70

799 controller's processing activities that presents such heightened risk of harm to a consumer. For
800 the purposes of this section, processing that presents a heightened risk of harm to a consumer
801 includes:
802 (1) The collection or processing of personal data for the purposes of targeted advertising;
803 (2) the sale of personal data;
804 (3) the processing of personal data for the purposes of profiling, where such profiling
805 presents a reasonably foreseeable risk of:
806 (A) unfair or deceptive treatment of, or unlawful disparate impact on, consumers,
807 (B) financial, physical or reputational injury to consumers,
808 (C) a physical or other intrusion upon the solitude or seclusion, or the private affairs or
809 concerns, of consumers, where such intrusion would be offensive to a reasonable person, or
810 (D) other substantial injury to consumers; and
811 (4) the collection or processing of sensitive data.
812 (b) Data protection assessments conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall
813 identify the categories of personal data collected, the purposes for collecting such personal data,
814 whether personal data is being transferred, and identify and weigh the benefits that may flow,
815 directly and indirectly, from the processing to the controller, the consumer, other stakeholders
816 and the public against the potential risks to the rights of the consumer associated with such
817 processing, as mitigated by safeguards that are employed by the controller to reduce such risks.
818 The controller shall factor into any such data protection assessment the use of de-identified data
40 of 70

819 and the reasonable expectations of consumers, as well as the context of the processing and the
820 relationship between the controller and the consumer whose personal data will be processed.
821 (c) No later than 30 days after completing a data protection assessment under this section,
822 a controller shall submit a report of the data protection assessment or evaluation to the Attorney
823 General. The report must include a summary of the data protection assessment and the controller
824 shall make the summary publicly available in a place that is easily accessible to consumers.
825 Controllers may redact trade secrets or other confidential or proprietary information from the
826 report, provided that notwithstanding the foregoing, the Attorney General may require that a
827 controller disclose any data protection assessment, and any information contained therein, that is
828 relevant to an investigation conducted by the Attorney General, and the controller shall make the
829 data protection assessment, and said information, available to the Attorney General. The
830 Attorney General may evaluate the data protection assessment for compliance with the
831 responsibilities set forth in this chapter. To the extent any information contained in a data
832 protection assessment disclosed to the Attorney General includes information subject to attorney-
833 client privilege or work product protection, such disclosure shall not constitute a waiver of such
834 privilege or protection.
835 (d) A single data protection assessment may address a comparable set of processing
836 operations that include similar activities.
837 (e) If a controller conducts a data protection assessment for the purpose of complying
838 with another applicable law or regulation, the data protection assessment shall be deemed to
839 satisfy the requirements established in this section if such data protection assessment is
41 of 70

840 reasonably similar in scope and effect to the data protection assessment that would otherwise be
841 conducted pursuant to this section.
842 (f) A controller shall conduct and document a data protection assessment before initiating
843 a processing activity that presents a heightened risk of harm to a consumer and shall review and
844 update the data protection assessment as often as appropriate considering the type, amount, and
845 sensitivity of personal data collected or processed and level of risk presented by the processing,
846 throughout the processing activity’s lifecycle in order to:
847 (1) monitor for harm caused by the processing and adjust safeguards accordingly; and
848 (2) ensure that data protection and privacy are considered as the controller makes new
849 decisions with respect to the processing.
850 (g) A controller or processor shall establish, implement, and maintain reasonable policies,
851 practices, and procedures that reflect the role of the controller or processor in the collection,
852 processing, and transferring of personal data and that:
853 (1) consider applicable federal and Massachusetts laws, rules, or regulations related to
854 personal data the controller or processor collects, processes, or transfers;
855 (2) identify, assess, and mitigate privacy risks related to minors;
856 (3) mitigate privacy risks related to the products and services of the controller or
857 processor, including in the design, development, and implementation of such products and
858 services, considering the role of the controller or processor and the information available to it;
42 of 70

859 (4) evaluate the length of time that personal data shall be retained and circumstances
860 under which personal data shall be deleted, de-identified, or otherwise modified with respect to
861 the purposes for which it was collected or processed and the sensitivity of the personal data; and
862 (5) implement reasonable training and safeguards within the controller or processor to
863 promote compliance with all privacy laws applicable to personal data the controller collects,
864 processes, or transfers or personal data the processor collects, processes, or transfers on behalf of
865 the controller and mitigate privacy risks taking into account the role of the controller or
866 processor and the information available to it.
867 (h) The policies, practices, and procedures established by a controller or processor under
868 subsection (g), shall correspond with, as applicable:
869 (1) the size of the controller or processor and the nature, scope, and complexity of the
870 activities engaged in by the controller or processor, including whether the controller or processer
871 is a large data holder, nonprofit organization, small business, third party, or data broker,
872 considering the role of the controller or processor and the information available to it;
873 (2) the sensitivity of the personal data collected, processed, or transferred by the
874 controller or processor;
875 (3) the volume of personal data collected, processed, or transferred by the controller or
876 processor;
877 (4) the number of individuals and devices to which the personal data collected, processed,
878 or transferred by the controller or processer relates; and
43 of 70

879 (5) the cost of implementing such policies, practices, and procedures in relation to the
880 risks and nature of the personal data.
881 Section 9. De-identified data.
882 (a) Any controller in possession of de-identified data shall:
883 (1) Take technical measures to ensure that the data cannot be associated with an
884 individual;
885 (2) publicly commit to maintaining and using de-identified data without attempting to re-
886 identify the data; and
887 (3) contractually obligate any recipients of the de-identified data to comply with all
888 provisions of this chapter.
889 (b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:
890 (1) Require a controller or processor to re-identify de-identified data; or
891 (2) maintain data in identifiable form, or collect, obtain, retain or access any data or
892 technology, in order to be capable of associating an authenticated consumer request with
893 personal data.
894 (c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a controller or processor to
895 comply with an authenticated consumer rights request if the controller:
896 (1) Is not reasonably capable of associating the request with the personal data or it would
897 be unreasonably burdensome for the controller to associate the request with the personal data;
898 and
44 of 70

899 (2) does not use the personal data to recognize or respond to the specific consumer who is
900 the subject of the personal data, or associate the personal data with other personal data about the
901 same specific consumer;
902 (d) A controller that transfers de-identified data shall exercise reasonable oversight to
903 monitor compliance with any contractual commitments to which the de-identified data is subject
904 and shall take appropriate steps to address any breaches of those contractual commitments.
905 Section 10. Limitations.
906 (a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict a controller's or processor's
907 ability to:
908 (1) Comply with federal or other Massachusetts laws;
909 (2) comply with a civil, criminal or regulatory inquiry, investigation, subpoena or
910 summons by federal, or Massachusetts state, municipal or other governmental authorities;
911 (3) cooperate with federal or Massachusetts law enforcement agencies concerning
912 conduct or activity that the controller or processor reasonably and in good faith believes may
913 violate federal or Massachusetts law
914 (4) investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for or defend legal claims;
915 (5) provide a product or service specifically requested by the consumer;
916 (6) perform under a contract to which a consumer is a party, including fulfilling the terms
917 of a written warranty;
918 (7) take steps at the request of a consumer prior to entering into a contract;
45 of 70

919 (8) take immediate steps to protect an interest that is essential for the life or physical
920 safety of the consumer or another individual, and where the processing cannot be manifestly
921 based on another legal basis;
922 (9) prevent, detect, protect against or respond to security incidents, identity theft, fraud,
923 harassment, malicious or deceptive activities or any illegal activity targeted at or involving the
924 controller or processor or its services, preserve the integrity or security of systems or investigate,
925 report or prosecute those responsible for any such action, provided that for the purposes of this
926 paragraph, “illegal activity” means a violation of a federal, state, or local law punishable as a
927 felony or misdemeanor that can directly harm;
928 (10) engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research in the
929 public interest that adheres to all relevant laws and regulations governing such research, if
930 applicable, and is approved, monitored and governed by an institutional review board that
931 determines, or similar independent oversight entities that determine,
932 (A) whether the deletion of personal data requested by a consumer under section 4,
933 subsection (a), subparagraph (4) is likely to provide substantial benefits that do not exclusively
934 accrue to the controller,
935 (B) the expected benefits of the research outweigh the privacy risks, and
936 (C) whether the controller has implemented reasonable safeguards to mitigate privacy
937 risks associated with research, including any risks associated with re-identification;
938 (11) assist another controller, processor or third party with any of the obligations under
939 this chapter;
46 of 70

940 (12) process personal data for reasons of public interest in the area of public health,
941 community health or population health, but solely to the extent that such processing is
942 (A) subject to suitable and specific measures to safeguard the rights of the consumer
943 whose personal data is being processed, and
944 (B) under the responsibility of a professional subject to confidentiality obligations under
945 federal, state or local law;
946 (13) ensure the data security and integrity of personal data as required by this chapter,
947 protect against spam, or protect and maintain networks and systems, including through
948 diagnostics, debugging, and repairs;
949 (14) transfer assets to a third party in the context of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy or
950 similar transaction when the third party assumes control, in whole or in part, of the controller’s
951 assets, only if the controller, in a reasonable time prior to the transfer, provides an affected
952 consumer with:
953 (A) A notice describing the transfer, including the name of the entity receiving the
954 consumer’s personal data and the applicable privacy notices of such entity and
955 (B) a reasonable opportunity to:
956 (i) withdraw previously provided consent related to the consumer’s personal data, and
957 (ii) request the deletion of the consumer’s personal data;
958 (15) effectuate a product recall pursuant to federal or state law, or to fulfill a warranty;
47 of 70

959 (16) conduct medical research in compliance with part 46 of title 45, Code of Federal
960 Regulations, or parts 50 and 56 of title 21, Code of Federal Regulations
961 (17) publish entity-based member or employee contact information where such
962 publication is intended to allow members of the public to contact such member or employee in
963 the ordinary course of the entity’s operations; or
964 (18) process personal data previously collected in accordance with this chapter such that
965 the personal data becomes de-identified data, including to:
966 (A) Conduct internal research to develop, improve or repair products, services or
967 technology;
968 (B) identify and repair technical errors that impair existing or intended functionality; or;
969 (C) perform solely internal operations that are reasonably aligned with the expectations of
970 the consumer or reasonably anticipated based on the consumer's existing relationship with the
971 controller, or are otherwise compatible with processing data in furtherance of the provision of a
972 product or service specifically requested by a consumer or the performance of a contract to
973 which the consumer is a party.
974 (b) The obligations imposed on controllers or processors under this chapter shall not
975 apply where compliance by the controller or processor with said sections would violate an
976 evidentiary privilege under the laws of this state. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
977 prevent a controller or processor from providing personal data concerning a consumer to a
978 person covered by an evidentiary privilege under the laws of the state as part of a privileged
979 communication.
48 of 70

980 (d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:
981 (1) Impose any obligation on a controller or processor that adversely affects the rights or
982 freedoms of any person, including, but not limited to, the rights of any person to freedom of
983 speech or freedom of the press guaranteed in the First Amendment to the United States
984 Constitution or Article 16 of the Massachusetts Declaration of Rights;
985 (2) apply to any person's collection or processing of personal data in the course of such
986 person's purely personal or household activities; or
987 (3) for private schools approved under section 1 of chapter 76 and private institutions of
988 higher education as defined by title I of the Higher Education Act of 1965, 20 United States
989 Code, Section 1001 et seq., require deletion of personal data that would unreasonably interfere
990 with the provision of education services by or the ordinary operation of the school or institution.
991 (4) for a consumer reporting agency, as defined in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(f), require deletion of
992 personal data used for the purpose of evaluating a consumer’s creditworthiness, credit standing,
993 credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics or mode of living, subject
994 to the provisions of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq.
995 (e) Personal data collected or processed by a controller pursuant to this section may be
996 collected or processed to the extent that such collection and processing is:
997 (1) Reasonably necessary and proportionate to the purposes listed in this section, or, in
998 the case of sensitive data, strictly necessary to the purposes listed in this section;
999 (2) limited to what is necessary in relation to the specific purposes listed in this section.
1000 Personal data processed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall, where applicable, take
49 of 70

1001 into account the nature and purpose or purposes of such processing. Such data shall be subject to
1002 reasonable administrative, technical and physical measures to protect the confidentiality,
1003 integrity and accessibility of the personal data and to reduce reasonably foreseeable risks of harm
1004 to consumers relating to such processing of personal data; and
1005 (3) compliant with section 4, subsection (f).
1006 (f) If a controller collects or processes personal data pursuant to an exemption in this
1007 section, the controller bears the burden of demonstrating that such collection or processing
1008 qualifies for the exemption and complies with the requirements in subsection (e) of this section.
1009 Section 11. Rulemaking.
1010 The Attorney General may adopt, amend, or rescind rules and regulations for the
1011 implementation, administration, and enforcement of this chapter.
1012 Section 12. Enforcement.
1013 (a) The Attorney General may bring a civil action against a controller or processor that
1014 violates this chapter, or a regulation adopted under this chapter, to:
1015 (1) Enjoin an act or practice that is in violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted
1016 under this chapter, including an order that an entity retrieve any personal data transferred in such
1017 violation;
1018 (2) enforce compliance with this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter and
1019 obtain declaratory relief;
50 of 70

1020 (3) obtain damages, including punitive damages, restitution of any money or property
1021 obtained directly or indirectly by any such violation, and disgorgement of any profits obtained
1022 directly or indirectly by any such violation on behalf of the residents of the Commonwealth or
1023 individuals present in the Commonwealth; (4) impose civil penalties in an amount not less than
1024 $15,000 per individual per violation, as adjusted annually to reflect an increase in the Consumer
1025 Price Index;
1026 (5) obtain investigative costs, reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation costs,
1027 including but not limited to expert fees, reasonably incurred; and
1028 (6) obtain any such other and further relief as the court may deem proper.
1029 (b) A violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter with respect to
1030 the personal data of a consumer constitutes an injury to that consumer. The injured consumer
1031 may bring a civil action against the party that commits the violation, provided such party is not a
1032 small business. In a civil action brought under this subsection in which a plaintiff prevails, the
1033 court may award the plaintiff:
1034 (1) Damages in an amount not less than $15,000 per individual per violation, as adjusted
1035 annually to reflect an increase in the Consumer Price Index, or actual damages, whichever is
1036 greater;
1037 (2) punitive damages;
1038 (3) injunctive relief, including an order that an entity retrieve any personal data
1039 transferred in violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter;
1040 (4) declaratory relief; or
51 of 70

1041 (5) reasonable attorney's fees and litigation costs.
1042 (c) When calculating awards and civil penalties in any action under this section, the court
1043 shall consider:
1044 (1) the number of affected individuals and the amount and sensitivity of any personal data
1045 at issue;
1046 (2) the severity of the violation or noncompliance;
1047 (3) the risks caused by the violation or noncompliance;
1048 (4) whether the violation or noncompliance was part of a pattern of noncompliance and
1049 violations and not an isolated instance;
1050 (5) whether the violation or noncompliance was willful and not the result of error;
1051 (6) the precautions taken by the defendant to prevent a violation;
1052 (7) the number of administrative actions, lawsuits, settlements, and consent-decrees under
1053 this chapter involving the defendant;
1054 (8) the number of administrative actions, lawsuits, settlements, and consent-decrees
1055 involving the defendant in other states and at the federal level in issues involving information
1056 privacy; and
1057 (9) the international record of the defendant when it comes to information privacy issues.
52 of 70

1058 (d) A violation of the requirements of this chapter, or a regulation adopted under this
1059 chapter, constitutes an unfair or deceptive practice in the conduct of trade or commerce for the
1060 purposes of chapter 93A.
1061 (e) Any provision of a contract or agreement of any kind, including but not limited to a
1062 controller’s terms of service or a privacy notice, including the short-form privacy notice required
1063 under section 15 subsection (h), that purports to waive or limit in any way an individual’s rights
1064 under this chapter, including but not limited to any right to a remedy or means of enforcement,
1065 shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.
1066 (g) No private or government action brought pursuant to this chapter shall preclude any
1067 other action under this chapter.
1068 (h) Notwithstanding paragraph A of section 99 of chapter 272, a person who willfully
1069 violates this chapter shall be punished to the same extent as a violation of subparagraph (3) of
1070 paragraph C of said section.
1071 Section 13. Relationship to Other Laws.
1072 (a) Nothing in this chapter shall diminish any individual’s rights or obligations under
1073 chapters 66A, 93A, 93H, 151B, or under sections 1B or 3B of chapter 214.
1074 (b) In a conflict between chapter 175I and this chapter, this chapter shall control.
1075 Section 14. Targeted Advertising to Minors.
1076 A controller shall not engage in targeted advertising or first-party advertising to a
1077 consumer if the controller knows or should have known that the consumer is a minor.
53 of 70

1078 Section 15. Data Brokers Annual Registration.
1079 (a) Annually, on or before January 31 following a year in which a person meets the
1080 definition of data broker, a data broker shall:
1081 (1) register with the OCABR;
1082 (2) pay a registration fee of $100.00; and
1083 (3) provide the following information:
1084 (A) the name and primary physical, e-mail, and internet addresses of the data broker;
1085 (B) if the data broker permits a consumer to opt out of the data broker’s collection of
1086 brokered personal information, opt out of its databases, or opt out of certain sales of data:
1087 (i) the method for requesting an opt-out;
1088 (ii) if the opt-out applies to only certain activities or sales, which ones; and
1089 (iii) whether the data broker permits a consumer to authorize a third party to perform the
1090 opt-out on the consumer’s behalf;
1091 (C) a statement specifying the data collection, databases, or sales activities from which a
1092 consumer may not opt out;
1093 (D) a statement whether the data broker implements a purchaser credentialing process;
1094 (E) the number of data broker security breaches that the data broker has experienced
1095 during the prior year, and if known, the total number of consumers affected by the breaches;
54 of 70

1096 (F) where the data broker has knowledge that it possesses the brokered personal
1097 information of minors, a separate statement detailing the data collection practices, databases,
1098 sales activities, and opt-out policies that are applicable to the brokered personal information of
1099 minors; and
1100 (G) any additional information or explanation the data broker chooses to provide
1101 concerning its data collection practices.
1102 (b) A data broker that fails to register pursuant to subsection (a) of this section is liable to
1103 the Commonwealth for:
1104 (1) a civil penalty of $125.00 for each day it fails to register pursuant to this section;
1105 (2) an amount equal to the fees due under this section during the period it failed to
1106 register pursuant to this section; and
1107 (3) other penalties imposed by law.
1108 (c) A data broker that omits required information from its registration shall file an
1109 amendment to include the omitted information within 30 business days following notification of
1110 the omission and is liable to the Commonwealth for a civil penalty of $1,000.00 per day for each
1111 day thereafter.
1112 (d) A data broker that files materially incorrect information in its registration:
1113 (1) is liable to the Commonwealth for a civil penalty of $25,000.00; and
55 of 70

1114 (2) if it fails to correct the false information within 30 business days after discovery or
1115 notification of the incorrect information, an additional civil penalty of $1,000.00 per day for each
1116 day thereafter that it fails to correct the information.
1117 Section 16. Data Broker Opt Out.
1118 (a) By January 1, 2027, the OCABR shall either partner with the California Privacy
1119 Protection Agency to make available California’s accessible deletion mechanism for
1120 Massachusetts consumers, in which case a data broker’s compliance with said mechanism for
1121 Massachusetts consumers shall satisfy the requirements of this paragraph, or establish an
1122 accessible deletion mechanism that does all of the following:
1123 (1) Implements and maintains reasonable security procedures and practices, including,
1124 but not limited to, administrative, physical, and technical safeguards appropriate to the nature of
1125 the information and the purposes for which the personal data will be used and to protect
1126 consumers’ personal data from unauthorized use, disclosure, access, destruction, or modification.
1127 (2) Allows a consumer, through a single verifiable consumer request, to request that
1128 every data broker that maintains any personal data delete any personal data related to that
1129 consumer held by the data broker or associated service provider or contractor.
1130 (3) Allows a consumer to selectively exclude specific data brokers from a request made
1131 under paragraph (2).
1132 (4) Allows a consumer to make a request to alter a previous request made under this
1133 subdivision after at least 45 days have passed since the consumer last made a request under this
1134 subdivision.
56 of 70

1135 (b) The accessible deletion mechanism established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall meet
1136 all of the following requirements:
1137 (1) The accessible deletion mechanism shall allow a consumer to request the deletion of
1138 all personal data related to that consumer through a single deletion request.
1139 (2) The accessible deletion mechanism shall permit a consumer to securely submit
1140 information in one or more privacy-protecting ways determined by the OCABR to aid in the
1141 deletion request.
1142 (3) The accessible deletion mechanism shall allow data brokers registered with the
1143 OCABR to determine whether an individual has submitted a verifiable consumer request to
1144 delete the personal data related to that consumer as described in paragraph (1) and shall not allow
1145 the disclosure of any additional personal data when the data broker accesses the accessible
1146 deletion mechanism unless otherwise specified in this title.
1147 (4) The accessible deletion mechanism shall allow a consumer to make a request
1148 described in paragraph (1) using an internet service operated by the OCABR.
1149 (5) The accessible deletion mechanism shall not charge a consumer to make a request
1150 described in paragraph (1).
1151 (6) The accessible deletion mechanism shall allow a consumer to make a request
1152 described in paragraph (1) in any language spoken by any consumer for whom personal data has
1153 been collected by data brokers.
1154 (7) The accessible deletion mechanism shall be readily accessible and usable by
1155 consumers with disabilities.
57 of 70

1156 (8) The accessible deletion mechanism shall support the ability of a consumer’s
1157 authorized agents to aid in the deletion request.
1158 (9) The accessible deletion mechanism shall allow the consumer, or their authorized
1159 agent, to verify the status of the consumer’s deletion request.
1160 (10) The accessible deletion mechanism shall provide a description of all of the
1161 following:
1162 (A) The deletion permitted by this section, including, but not limited to, the actions
1163 required by subdivisions (c) and (d).
1164 (B) The process for submitting a deletion request pursuant to this section.
1165 (C) Examples of the types of information that may be deleted.
1166 (c) (1) Beginning August 1, 2027, a data broker shall access the accessible deletion
1167 mechanism established pursuant to subdivision (a) at least once every 45 days and do all of the
1168 following:
1169 (A) Within 45 days after receiving a request made pursuant to this section, process all
1170 deletion requests made pursuant to this section and delete all personal data related to the
1171 consumers making the requests consistent with the requirements of this section.
1172 (B) In cases where a data broker denies a consumer request to delete under this title
1173 because the request cannot be verified, process the request as an opt-out of the sale or sharing of
1174 the consumer’s personal data, as provided under this chapter.
58 of 70

1175 (C) Direct all service providers or contractors associated with the data broker to delete all
1176 personal data in their possession related to the consumers making the requests described in
1177 subparagraph (A).
1178 (D) Direct all service providers or contractors associated with the data broker to process a
1179 request described by subparagraph (B) as an opt-out of the sale or sharing of the consumer’s
1180 personal data, as provided under this chapter.
1181 (2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a data broker shall not be required to delete a
1182 consumer’s personal data if either of the following apply:
1183 (A) It is reasonably necessary for the data broker to maintain the personal data to fulfill a
1184 purpose described in section 10.
1185 (B) The deletion is not required under this chapter.
1186 (3) Personal information described in paragraph (2) shall only be used for the purposes
1187 described in paragraph (2) and shall not be used or disclosed for any other purpose, including,
1188 but not limited to, marketing purposes.
1189 (d) (1) Beginning August 1, 2027, after a consumer has submitted a deletion request and
1190 a data broker has deleted the consumer’s data pursuant to this section, the data broker shall delete
1191 all personal data of the consumer at least once every 45 days pursuant to this section unless the
1192 consumer requests otherwise or the deletion is not required pursuant to paragraph (2) of
1193 subdivision (c).
1194 (2) Beginning August 1, 2027, after a consumer has submitted a deletion request and a
1195 data broker has deleted the consumer’s data pursuant to this section, the data broker shall not sell
59 of 70

1196 or share new personal data of the consumer unless the consumer requests otherwise or selling or
1197 sharing the personal data is permitted under this chapter.
1198 (e) (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, and every three years thereafter, a data broker shall
1199 undergo an audit by an independent third party to determine compliance with this section.
1200 (2) For an audit completed pursuant to paragraph (1), the data broker shall submit a report
1201 resulting from the audit and any related materials to the OCABR within five business days of a
1202 written request from the OCABR.
1203 (3) A data broker shall maintain the report and materials described in paragraph (2) for at
1204 least six years.
1205 (f) (1) The OCABR may charge an access fee to a data broker when the data broker
1206 accesses the accessible deletion mechanism pursuant to subdivision (d) that does not exceed the
1207 reasonable costs of providing that access.
1208 Section 17. Data Broker Credentialing.
1209 (1) A data broker shall maintain reasonable procedures designed to ensure that the
1210 brokered personal data it discloses is used for a legitimate and legal purpose.
1211 (2) These procedures shall require that prospective users of the information identify
1212 themselves, certify the purposes for which the information is sought, and certify that the
1213 information shall be used for no other purpose.
1214 (3) A data broker shall make a reasonable effort to verify the identity of a new
1215 prospective user and the uses certified by the prospective user prior to furnishing the user
1216 brokered personal data.
60 of 70

1217 (4) A data broker shall not furnish brokered personal data to any person if it has
1218 reasonable grounds for believing that the brokered personal data will not be used for a legitimate
1219 and legal purpose.
1220 SECTION 2. The General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, are hereby
1221 amended by inserting after chapter 93M the following chapter:
1222 Chapter 93N. Location Shield Act.
1223 Section 1. Definitions
1224 (a) As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires
1225 otherwise, have the following meanings:
1226 (1) “Collect”, to obtain, infer, generate, create, receive, or access an individual’s location
1227 information.
1228 (2) “Consent”, freely given, specific, informed, unambiguous, opt-in consent. This term
1229 does not include either of the following: (i) agreement secured without first providing to the
1230 individual a clear and conspicuous disclosure of all information material to the provision of
1231 consent, apart from any privacy policy, terms of service, terms of use, general release, user
1232 agreement, or other similar document; or (ii) agreement obtained through the use of a user
1233 interface designed or manipulated with the substantial effect of subverting or impairing user
1234 autonomy, decision making, or choice.
1235 (3) “Covered entity”, any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company,
1236 association, or other group, however organized. A covered entity does not include a state or local
1237 government agency, or any court of Massachusetts, a clerk of the court, or a judge or justice
61 of 70

1238 thereof. A covered entity does not include an individual acting in a non-commercial context. A
1239 covered entity includes all agents of the entity.
1240 (5) “Device”, a mobile telephone, as defined in section 1 of chapter 90 of the general
1241 laws, or any other electronic device that is or may commonly be carried by or on an individual
1242 and is capable of connecting to a cellular, bluetooth, or other wireless network.
1243 (6) “Disclose”, to make location information available to a third party, including but not
1244 limited to by sharing, publishing, releasing, transferring, disseminating, providing access to, or
1245 otherwise communicating such location information orally, in writing, electronically, or by any
1246 other means.
1247 (7) “Individual”, a person located in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
1248 (8) “Location information”, information derived from technology, including but not
1249 limited to, a device or from interactions between devices, with or without the knowledge of the
1250 user and regardless of the technological method used, that pertains to or directly or indirectly
1251 reveals the present or past geographical location of an individual or device within the
1252 Commonwealth of Massachusetts with sufficient precision to identify street-level location
1253 information within a range of 1,850 feet or less. Location information includes but is not limited
1254 to (i) an internet protocol address capable of revealing the physical or geographical location of an
1255 individual; (ii) Global Positioning System (GPS) coordinates; and (iii) cell-site location
1256 information. This term does not include location information identifiable or derived solely from
1257 the visual content of a legally obtained image, including the location of the device that captured
1258 such image, or publicly posted words.
62 of 70

1259 (9) “Location Privacy Policy”, a description of the policies, practices, and procedures
1260 controlling a covered entity’s collection, processing, management, storage, retention, and
1261 deletion of location information.
1262 (10) “Monetize”, to collect, process, or disclose an individual’s location information for
1263 profit or in exchange for monetary or other consideration. This term includes but is not limited to
1264 selling, renting, trading, or leasing location information.
1265 (11) “Person”, any natural person.
1266 (12) “Permissible purpose”, one of the following purposes: (i) provision of a product,
1267 service, or service feature to the individual to whom the location information pertains when that
1268 individual requested the provision of such product, service, or service feature by subscribing to,
1269 creating an account, or otherwise contracting with a covered entity; (ii) initiation, management,
1270 execution, or completion of a financial or commercial transaction or fulfill an order for specific
1271 products or services requested by an individual, including any associated routine administrative,
1272 operational, and account-servicing activity such as billing, shipping, delivery, storage, and
1273 accounting; (iii) compliance with an obligation under federal or state law; or (iv) response to an
1274 emergency service agency, an emergency alert, a 911 communication, or any other
1275 communication reporting an imminent threat to human life.
1276 (13) “Process”, to perform any action or set of actions on or with location information,
1277 including but not limited to collecting, accessing, using, storing, retaining, analyzing, creating,
1278 generating, aggregating, altering, correlating, operating on, recording, modifying, organizing,
1279 structuring, disposing of, destroying, de-identifying, or otherwise manipulating location
1280 information. This term does not include disclosing location information.
63 of 70

1281 (14) “Reasonably understandable”, of length and complexity such that an individual with
1282 an eighth-grade reading level, as established by the department of elementary and secondary
1283 education, can read and comprehend.
1284 (15) “Service feature”, a discrete aspect of a service provided by a covered entity,
1285 including but not limited to real-time directions, real-time weather, and identity authentication.
1286 (16) "Service provider”, an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability
1287 company, association, or other group, however organized, that collects, processes, or transfers
1288 location information for the sole purpose of, and only to the extent that such service provider is,
1289 conducting business activities on behalf of, for the benefit of, at the direction of, and under
1290 contractual agreement with a covered entity.
1291 (17) “Third party”, any covered entity or person other than (i) a covered entity that
1292 collected or processed location information in accordance with this chapter or its service
1293 providers, or (ii) the individual to whom the location information pertains. This term does not
1294 include government entities.
1295 Section 2. Protection of location information
1296 (a) It shall be unlawful for a covered entity to collect or process an individual’s location
1297 information except for a permissible purpose. Prior to collecting or processing an individual’s
1298 location information for one of those permissible purposes, a covered entity shall provide the
1299 individual with a copy of the Location Privacy Policy and obtain consent from that individual;
1300 provided, however, that this shall not be required when the collection and processing is done in
1301 (1) compliance with an obligation under federal or state law or (2) in response to an emergency
64 of 70

1302 service agency, an emergency alert, a 911 communication, or any other communication reporting
1303 an imminent threat to human life.
1304 (b) If a covered entity collects location information for the provision of multiple
1305 permissible purposes, it shall be mentioned in the Location Privacy Policy and individuals shall
1306 provide discrete consent for each purpose; provided, however, that this shall not be required for
1307 the purpose of collecting and processing location information to comply with an obligation under
1308 federal or state law or to respond to an emergency service agency, an emergency alert, a 911
1309 communication, or any other communication reporting an imminent threat to human life.
1310 (c) A covered entity that directly delivers targeted advertisements as part of its product or
1311 services shall provide individuals with a clear, conspicuous, and simple means to opt out of the
1312 processing of their location information for purposes of selecting and delivering targeted
1313 advertisements.
1314 (d) Consent provided under this section shall expire (1) after one year, (2) when the initial
1315 purpose for processing the information has been satisfied, or (3) when the individual revokes
1316 consent, whichever occurs first, provided that consent may be renewed pursuant to the same
1317 procedures. Upon expiration of consent, any location information possessed by a covered entity
1318 shall be permanently destroyed.
1319 (e) It shall be unlawful for a covered entity or service provider that lawfully collects and
1320 processes location information to:
1321 (1) collect more precise location information than necessary to carry out the permissible
1322 purpose;
65 of 70

1323 (2) retain location information longer than necessary to carry out the permissible purpose;
1324 (3) sell, rent, trade, or lease location information to third parties; or
1325 (4) derive or infer from location information any data that is not necessary to carry out a
1326 permissible purpose.
1327 (5) disclose, cause to disclose, or assist with or facilitate the disclosure of an individual’s
1328 location information to third parties, unless such disclosure is (i) necessary to carry out the
1329 permissible purpose for which the information was collected, or (ii) requested by the individual
1330 to whom the location data pertains.
1331 (f) It shall be unlawful for a covered entity or service providers to disclose location
1332 information to any federal, state, or local government agency or official unless (1) the agency or
1333 official serves the covered entity or service provider with a valid warrant or establishes the
1334 existence of exigent circumstances that make it impracticable to obtain a warrant, (2) disclosure
1335 is mandated under federal or state law, including in response to a court order or lawfully issued
1336 and properly served subpoena or civil investigative demand under state or federal law, or (3) the
1337 data subject requests such disclosure.
1338 (g) A covered entity shall maintain and make available to the data subject a Location
1339 Privacy Policy, which shall include, at a minimum, the following:
1340 (1) the permissible purpose for which the covered entity is collecting, processing, or
1341 disclosing any location information;
1342 (2) the type of location information collected, including the precision of the data;
66 of 70

1343 (3) the identities of service providers with which the covered entity contracts with respect
1344 to location data;
1345 (4) any disclosures of location data necessary to carry out a permissible purpose and the
1346 identities of the third parties to whom the location information could be disclosed;
1347 (5) whether the covered entity’s practices include the internal use of location information
1348 for purposes of targeted advertisement;
1349 (6) the data management and data security policies governing location information; and
1350 (7) the retention schedule and guidelines for permanently deleting location information.
1351 (h) A covered entity in lawful possession of location information shall provide notice to
1352 individuals to whom that information pertains of any change to its Location Privacy Policy at
1353 least 20 business days before the change goes into effect, and shall request and obtain consent
1354 before collecting or processing location information in accordance with the new Location
1355 Privacy Policy.
1356 (i) It shall be unlawful for a government entity to monetize location information.
1357 Section 3: Prohibition Against Retaliation
1358 A covered entity shall not take adverse action against an individual because the
1359 individual exercised or refused to waive any of such individual’s rights under this chapter, unless
1360 location data is essential to the provision of the good, service, or service feature that the
1361 individual requests, and then only to the extent that such data is essential. This prohibition
1362 includes but is not limited to:
67 of 70

1363 (1) refusing to provide a good or service to the individual;
1364 (2) charging different prices or rates for goods or services, including through the use of
1365 discounts or other benefits or imposing penalties; or
1366 (3) providing a different level or quality of goods or services to the individual.
1367 Section 4. Enforcement
1368 (a) A violation of this chapter or a regulation promulgated under this chapter regarding an
1369 individual’s location information constitutes an injury to that individual and shall be deemed an
1370 unfair or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce under chapter 93A.
1371 (b) Any individual alleging a violation of this chapter by a covered entity or service
1372 provider may bring a civil action in the superior court or any court of competent jurisdiction;
1373 provided that, venue in the superior court shall be proper in the county in which the plaintiff
1374 resides or was located at the time of any violation.
1375 (c) An individual protected by this chapter shall not be required, as a condition of service
1376 or otherwise, to file an administrative complaint with the attorney general or to accept mandatory
1377 arbitration of a claim arising under this chapter.
1378 (d) In a civil action in which the plaintiff prevails, the court may award (1) actual
1379 damages, including damages for emotional distress, or $5,000 per violation, whichever is greater,
1380 (2) punitive damages; and (3) any other relief, including but not limited to an injunction or
1381 declaratory judgment, that the court deems to be appropriate. The court shall consider each
1382 instance in which a covered entity or service provider collects, processes, or discloses location
1383 information in a manner prohibited by this chapter or a regulation promulgated under this chapter
68 of 70

1384 as constituting a separate violation of this chapter or regulation promulgated under this chapter.
1385 In addition to any relief awarded, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to
1386 any prevailing plaintiff.
1387 (e) The attorney general may bring an action pursuant to section 4 of chapter 93A against
1388 a covered entity or service provider to remedy violations of this chapter and for other relief that
1389 may be appropriate.
1390 (f) Any provision of a contract or agreement of any kind, including a covered entity’s
1391 terms of service or policies, including but not limited to the Location Privacy Policy, that
1392 purports to waive or limit in any way an individual’s rights under this chapter, including but not
1393 limited to any right to a remedy or means of enforcement, shall be deemed contrary to state law
1394 and shall be void and unenforceable.
1395 (g) No private or government action brought pursuant to this chapter shall preclude any
1396 other action under this chapter.
1397 Section 5. Implementation
1398 The Attorney General may adopt, amend or repeal rules and regulations for the
1399 implementation, administration, and enforcement of this chapter.
1400 SECTION 3. Location Information Collected Before Effective Date
1401 Location information collected, processed, and stored prior to the effective date of this
1402 Act shall be subject to subsections 2(e)(3), 2(e)(5), and 2(f) of Chapter 93N.
1403 SECTION 4. The first data protection assessments required by section 8 shall be
1404 completed not later than one year from the effective date of this Act.
69 of 70

1405 SECTION 5. Section 1 shall take effect one year after enactment.
1406 SECTION 6. Sections 2 and 3 shall take effect six months after enactment.
70 of 70